Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.220

When review procedure may be dispensed with.

Annexations under the provisions of RCW 35A.14.295, 35A.14.297, 35A.14.300, and 35A.14.310 shall not be subject to review by the annexation review board: PROVIDED, That in any county in which a boundary review board is established under chapter 36.93 RCW all annexations shall be subject to review except as provided for in RCW 36.93.110. When the area proposed for annexation in a petition or resolution, initiated and filed under any of the methods of initiating annexation authorized by this chapter, is less than fifty acres or less than two million dollars in assessed valuation, review procedures shall not be required as to such annexation proposal, except as provided in chapter 36.93 RCW in those counties with a review board established pursuant to chapter 36.93 RCW: PROVIDED, That when an annexation proposal is initiated by the direct petition method authorized by RCW 35A.14.120, review procedures shall not be required without regard to acreage or assessed valuation, except as provided in chapter 36.93 RCW in those counties with a boundary review board established pursuant to chapter 36.93 RCW.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 27; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 26; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.220.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.